Hawaii statutes.
§325-77 Notice. The department of
health shall conduct such examinations at such places throughout the State as
it deems advisable after the giving of a public notice of the time and place
the examinations are to be held. [L 1947, c 79, §2; am L 1949, c 60, §1; RL
1955, §49-70; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §325-77]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next